Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-472
Permit to kill mountain lions; eligibility.

(1)
The commission may issue a permit for the killing of one or more mountain
lions which are preying on livestock or poultry. The permit shall be valid
for up to thirty days and shall require the commission to be notified immediately
by the permitholder after the killing of a mountain lion and shall require
the carcass to be transferred to the commission.

(2)
To be eligible for a permit under this section, a farmer or rancher owning
or operating a farm or ranch shall contact the commission to confirm that
livestock or poultry on his or her property or property under his or her control
has been subject to depredation by a mountain lion. The commission shall confirm
that the damage was caused by a mountain lion prior to issuing the permit.
The farmer or rancher shall be allowed up to thirty days, as designated by
the commission, to kill the mountain lion on such property and shall notify
the commission immediately after the killing of a mountain lion and arrange
with the commission to transfer the mountain lion to the commission.

(3) The commission
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2010, LB836, § 5.